Utah statutes.
67-5a-8.   Administration.

(1) (a)  The administration costs of this chapter, including council staff compensation, shall be funded from appropriations made by the Legislature to the Office of the Attorney General for the support of the council from the Public Safety Support Account established in Section 51-9-404.

(b)  Funds available from other sources may also be appropriated by the Legislature to the Office of the Attorney General for the administration of this chapter.

(2)  In exercising its duties, the council shall minimize costs of administration and utilize existing training facilities and resources where possible so the greatest portion of the funds available are expended for training prosecuting attorneys.

(3)  Council staff may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

